Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 3. Licensing of Sport Fishing and Hunting.
Sec. 16.05.341.
Free license for disabled veterans and active members of the Alaska National Guard and military reserves.

A person may receive a resident hunting and sport fishing license under AS

16.05.340(a)(5)

without charge if the person

has been discharged from military service under honorable conditions, is eligible for a loan under AS

18.56.101

, and is certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as having incurred a 50 percent or greater disability during military service;

served in the Alaska Territorial Guard, is eligible for a loan under AS

18.56.101

, and incurred a 50 percent or greater disability while serving in the Alaska Territorial Guard; or

is an active member of the

Alaska National Guard;

United States Army reserves;

United States Air Force reserves;

United States Navy reserves;

United States Marine Corps reserves; or

United States Coast Guard reserves.

History.

(§ 1 ch 21 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 93 SLA 1991; am § 70 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 51 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as the second sentence of former AS

16.05.340(a)(4)

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 16.05.343.
Auctions or raffles for big game harvest permits.

The department may donate each year for a competitive auction or raffle harvest permits for four elk from the Etolin Island herd and one bison. The donation may be made only to a nonprofit corporation established to promote education in outdoor traditions and conservation and wildlife protection programs in partnership with the department, subject to the terms of a memorandum of agreement developed by the department.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 47 SLA 2014.]

The department, subject to regulations adopted by the commissioner, may issue, through a competitive auction or raffle, up to three harvest permits each year for Dall sheep, up to two harvest permits each year for bison, and up to four harvest permits each year for each of the following big game species: musk ox, brown or grizzly bear, black bear, moose, caribou, goat, elk, and wolf. Notwithstanding AS 36.30, the department may authorize a qualified organization selected under (e) of this section to conduct the auction or raffle on behalf of the department. If the department does authorize a qualified organization to conduct an auction or raffle for a big game species, the department shall make available to a qualified organization at least one harvest permit for that species. If the auction or raffle is conducted by a qualified organization, the organization may retain an amount from the gross proceeds of the auction or raffle equal to the administrative cost of the auction or raffle plus an amount not to exceed 30 percent of the net proceeds. The percent of the proceeds from the auction or raffle of a big game harvest permit retained by the organization may be used only to support outdoor tradition education projects and conservation and wildlife protection programs approved by the department and may not be used to make a contribution to any candidate for political office or to any organization supporting or opposing ballot propositions or to pay expenses associated with lobbying the legislature or administration. All proceeds from the auction or raffle of the big game harvest permit less the amount that is retained by a qualified organization under this subsection shall be deposited in the fish and game fund under AS

16.05.100

. A person who is issued a big game harvest permit under this subsection shall receive upon the person’s request a complimentary hunting license and a big game tag for the big game species for which the big game harvest permit is issued. A hunting license issued under this subsection must bear the inscription “Governor’s license” or a similar designation. A person who receives a big game harvest permit, hunting license, or big game tag under this subsection may exercise the privileges conveyed by the permit, license, or tag only in accordance with applicable law. In this subsection, “qualified organization” means an organization selected under (e) of this section.

Auctions and raffles of harvest permits authorized under this section are not subject to AS 05.15.

The department may select a nonprofit organization that promotes education in outdoor traditions and that conducts conservation and wildlife protection programs to conduct auctions or raffles for the department under (c) of this section. An organization selected under this subsection is a qualified organization for purposes of (c) of this section if the organization

is incorporated in the state as a nonprofit corporation; and

in the judgment of the department, demonstrates support for a state-based model through a user-pays system based on sustained yield and use principles.

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1996; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 47 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

Sec. 16.05.345.
Musk oxen. [Repealed, § 4 ch 57 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 16.05.346.
Permit applications.

If the Board of Game establishes an open season for musk oxen and has not reduced or eliminated the $500 resident tag and fee under AS

16.05.340(a)(16)

, the department shall conduct a drawing for permits to take the musk oxen. If the Board of Game establishes an open season for musk oxen for which the Board of Game has reduced or eliminated the resident tag and fee, the department shall issue permits to take the musk oxen in the order in which applications are received by the department. The department may not charge a resident a fee for an application for a musk oxen permit for an open season in which the Board of Game has reduced or eliminated the resident tag and fee under AS

16.05.340(a)(16)

. In all other cases, the application fee for a musk oxen permit is $10.

The application fee for a drawing permit issued by the department for the hunting of bison is $10.

Except as provided in (a) and (b) of this section, the permit application fee for all species for which a limited drawing is conducted is $5.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 39 SLA 2001.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 57 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 118 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 39 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

16.05.345

. Renumbered in 1980.

Administrative Code. —

For seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 85, art. 2.

Sec. 16.05.350.
Expiration of licenses, permits, and tags.

Licenses, permits, and tags required under AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

, except biennial licenses, triennial licenses, the nonresident sport fishing licenses, the resident trapping license, the nonresident anadromous king salmon tags, the waterfowl conservation tag, and permits having a different specified expiration date, expire at the close of December 31 following issuance.

Biennial licenses expire after December 31 of the year following the year of issuance.

Triennial licenses expire after December 31 of the second year following the year of issuance.

The resident trapping license expires at the close of September 30 of the year following the year in which the license is issued.

The waterfowl conservation tag expires at the close of January 31 of the year following the year of issue of the tag.

History.

(§ 3 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1964; am § 13 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 71 SLA 1984; am § 18 ch 81 SLA 1984; am § 14 ch 132 SLA 1984; am § 45 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 17 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 74 SLA 1997)

Sec. 16.05.352.
Fish and game conservation decal.

The department shall annually produce and make available to the public fish and game conservation decals. The department shall, by appropriate means, provide for the selection of designs for fish and game conservation decals and for the production and sale of the decals. The department may produce and sell different decals in quantities that the commissioner considers appropriate. Upon payment of a $20 fee, a person may purchase a fish and game conservation decal from the department. Subject to appropriation by the legislature, money received under this section may be used by the department to fund programs benefiting fish and wildlife conservation.

History.

(§ 23 ch 18 SLA 2016)

Sec. 16.05.360.
Commissioner charged with license issuance.

The commissioner or an authorized deputy shall issue each license and tag to a qualified person under written application containing such reasonable information as required by the commissioner. The commissioner shall designate the license and tag form or type. The form or type must be sufficient to identify and locate the applicant and establish the applicant’s status as to residency and citizenship. Each application shall be subscribed by the applicant.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 39 SLA 2001.]

History.

(§ 4 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 31 SLA 1963; am E.O. No. 73 § 4 (1989); am §§ 8, 9 ch 132 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 39 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For license officers, see 15 AAC 116, art. 1.

For licensing, see 15 AAC 116, art. 2.

Sec. 16.05.370.
Reports by licensees.

The commissioner may require a report to be made by each licensee concerning the time, manner, and place of taking fish and game, the kinds and quantity taken, and other information helpful in administering the fish and game resources of the state.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 37 SLA 1989.]

[Repealed, § 18 ch 37 SLA 1989.]

History.

(§ 4 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 31 SLA 1963; am § 8 ch 160 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 37 SLA 1989)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 1, art. 1.

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 2, art. 1.

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 77, art. 1.

For licenses, harvest tickets, harvest reports, tags, and fees, see 5 AAC 92, art. 2.

For possession and transportation, see 5 AAC 92, art. 6.

Sec. 16.05.380.
Commissioner may appoint agents.

The commissioner may appoint state employees or other persons to take applications, issue licenses, permits, and tags, and collect fees. The commissioner is not liable for defalcation or failure to account for the fees collected by any person so appointed, but the commissioner shall require a bond in an adequate sum, conditioned upon faithfully accounting for all money collected. However, the commissioner may waive the bond requirements of an instrumentality of the United States or its agents and employees when the instrumentality or its agents or employees sell licenses, permits, or tags primarily to persons in the armed forces. Each person, upon appointment by the commissioner, may administer oaths on applications for licenses, permits, and tags.

History.

(§ 5 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 14 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 31 SLA 1963; am E.O. No. 73 § 5 (1989); am § 18 ch 30 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For license officers, see 15 AAC 116, art. 1.

Sec. 16.05.390.
Fees and compensation for issuance of licenses, permits, and tags.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, an agent appointed by the commissioner under AS

16.05.380

to sell licenses, permits, and tags is entitled to

retain five percent of the fee that is charged for a license, permit, or tag or 25 cents for each license, permit, or tag sold, whichever is greater; and

compensation of $50 per year or $1 for each license, permit, or tag sold during the year, whichever is greater.

Each agent appointed to sell licenses, permits, or tags under AS

16.05.380

shall, as directed by the commissioner, transmit the proceeds from the sales of licenses, permits, and tags, except the amount authorized to be retained under (a)(1) of this section, together with a report of the sales, to the commissioner for deposit in the fish and game fund or the general fund.

On March 31, June 30, September 30, and December 31 of each year the commissioner shall calculate the compensation earned by an agent under (a)(2) of this section, minus the penalties assessed under (g) of this section. If the compensation due exceeds $50, the commissioner shall pay the compensation not later than 30 days after the date for which the compensation was calculated. If the compensation due is $50 or less, the commissioner shall pay the compensation not later than January 30 of the year following the year in which the compensation was earned. The commissioner shall pay compensation only for sales of licenses, permits, or tags for which the commissioner has received the report and proceeds required to be transmitted under (b) of this section.

Compensation provided by this section shall be paid from appropriations made to the department.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to a state employee appointed by the commissioner under AS

16.05.380

to sell licenses, permits, and tags.

Proceeds and reports under (b) of this section shall be transmitted to the commissioner by the last day of the month following the month in which the licenses, permits, and tags are sold, unless an alternative reporting schedule has been established by contract.

The commissioner may assess a penalty against an agent who does not transmit proceeds within the time allowed under (f) of this section. The penalty is equal to one and one-half percent of the amount of proceeds due. The penalty may be assessed for each month or portion of a month that the proceeds are delinquent. A penalty under this subsection shall be withheld from the agent’s compensation under (a)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 6 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 15 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1962; am § 6 ch 31 SLA 1963; am § 3 ch 268 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 109 SLA 1982; am § 27 ch 14 SLA 1987; am E.O. No. 73 § 6 (1989); am §§ 1, 2 ch 21 SLA 1990; am § 46 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 19 — 23 ch 30 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For license officers, see 15 AAC 116, art. 1.

Sec. 16.05.395.
Sport fishing vessel registration.

A person may not use a vessel to provide sport fishing services unless the vessel is registered with the department and proof of registration is attached to and clearly visible on the vessel while the vessel is used to provide sport fishing services. The department shall register vessels used to provide sport fishing services, and provide proof of registration, without charge. The department may adopt regulations as the department finds necessary to implement this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 70 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 30 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For fishing services and sport fishing guides, see 5 AAC 75, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, substituted “A” for “For calendar year 2005 and subsequent calendar years, a”; deleted “under AS

16.40.260

–

16.40.299

” preceding “unless the vessel”.

Sec. 16.05.400.
Persons exempt from annual licensing requirements.

A license is not required of a resident under 18 years of age or a nonresident under 16 years of age for sport fishing nor is a license required of a resident under 18 years of age for hunting or trapping.

Upon request, and without charge, the commissioner shall issue a sport fishing, hunting, or trapping identification card to a resident who is 60 years of age or older. The commissioner shall issue a permanent identification card without charge to a person who qualifies by age and residence and who completes the forms required by the commissioner for implementation of this subsection. A person who is issued a permanent identification card under this subsection may not sport fish, hunt, or trap without having a valid identification card issued under this subsection or the appropriate license in possession.

History.

(§ 9 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 180 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 67 SLA 1983; am E.O. No. 73 § 7 (1989); am § 4 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 24 ch 18 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 15 AAC 116, art. 2.

Sec. 16.05.403.
Special licenses and permits.

A resident hunting license, a resident sport fishing license, a resident subsistence fishing permit, or a resident personal use fishing permit indicating that the purchaser is blind may be obtained from the department upon payment of the fee prescribed in AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

and upon presentation of either an affidavit of the applicant stating that the applicant cannot distinguish light from darkness or an affidavit signed by a licensed physician or a licensed optometrist stating that the applicant’s central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with correcting lenses or that the applicant’s widest diameter of visual field subtends an angle no greater than 20 degrees.

A resident who is a person with physical disabilities may obtain from the department upon payment of the fee prescribed in AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

and upon submission of satisfactory proof of physical disabilities a resident hunting license, a resident sport fishing license, a resident subsistence fishing permit, or a resident personal use fishing permit indicating that the purchaser is a person with physical disabilities.

A resident who is 65 years of age or older may obtain from the department upon payment of the fee prescribed in AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

and upon submission of satisfactory proof of age a resident hunting license, a resident sport fishing license, a resident subsistence fishing permit, or a resident personal use fishing permit indicating that the purchaser is a person who is 65 years of age or older. This subsection does not limit the right of a resident person who is 65 years of age or older to obtain a permanent identification card under AS

16.05.400(b)

.

A resident who is a person with developmental disabilities may obtain from the department upon payment of the fee prescribed in AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

and upon submission of satisfactory proof of developmental disabilities a resident hunting license, a resident sport fishing license, a resident subsistence fishing permit, or a resident personal use fishing permit indicating that the purchaser is a person with developmental disabilities. This subsection does not require the department to issue a license or permit to a person with a developmental disability who is prohibited from possessing a firearm or ammunition under 18 U.S.C. 922 as a result of an involuntary commitment or an adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence.

History.

(§ 2 ch 81 SLA 1992; am §§ 25, 26 ch 18 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 1, art. 1.

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 2, art. 1.

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 77, art. 1.

Sec. 16.05.404.
Transferability of hunting permits awarded by drawing.

The department may transfer or reissue a hunting permit for a hunt that was originally awarded to a resident by drawing established by the Board of Game under AS

16.05.255(a)

to a qualified substitute, if the person to whom the hunting permit was originally awarded has died and the person’s spouse, or if there is no spouse, an immediate family member of the decedent,

applies for the hunting permit to be transferred or reissued to a qualified substitute named in the application; and

provides proof acceptable to the department of the person’s death.

To qualify as a substitute under this section, an individual must be a state resident.

An application to transfer or reissue a hunting permit under this section may be made only before the end of the period during which the hunting permit is valid.

A hunting permit may only be transferred or reissued under this section to a substitute who is qualified under the conditions that applied to the person to whom the hunting permit was originally awarded. A hunting permit may be transferred or reissued under this section only for the specific hunt for which the permit was originally awarded.

In this section, “immediate family member” means a parent, sibling, or child related by blood, marriage, or adoption.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 2021)

Effective dates. —

Section 4,
ch. 18, SLA 2021 makes this section effective July 14, 2021, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 3,
ch. 18, SLA 2021, this section “applies to the transfer or reissuance of a hunting permit that was originally awarded before, on, or after July 14, 2021.”

Sec. 16.05.405.
Taking fish and game by proxy.

Subject to regulations adopted by the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game to implement this section, including regulations relating to or restricting seasons, areas, methods and means, and species, a resident may take fish or game harvested primarily for food on behalf of another person under this section.

Notwithstanding AS

16.05.420(c)

, a resident holding a valid resident hunting license may take game on behalf of a person who is blind, a person with physical or developmental disabilities, or a person who is 65 years of age or older if the resident possesses on the resident’s person

a document signed by the person on whose behalf the game is taken, stating that the resident possesses the person’s hunting license or permanent identification card issued under AS

16.05.400(b)

in order to take game on behalf of that person; and

the person’s

resident hunting license issued under AS

16.05.403

or permanent identification card issued under AS

16.05.400(b)

; and

harvest ticket, tag, stamp, or other document required by law as a condition of taking the game being hunted.

Notwithstanding AS

16.05.420(c)

, a resident holding a valid noncommercial fishing license may take fish on behalf of a person who is blind, a person with physical or developmental disabilities, or a person who is 65 years of age or older if the resident possesses on the resident’s person

a document signed by the person on whose behalf the fish is taken, stating that the resident possesses the person’s sport fishing license, subsistence fishing permit, personal use fishing permit, or permanent identification card issued under AS

16.05.400(b)

in order to take fish on behalf of that person;

the person’s

resident sport fishing license issued under AS

16.05.403

or permanent identification card issued under AS

16.05.400(b)

;

resident subsistence fishing permit issued under AS

16.05.403

; or

resident personal use fishing permit issued under AS 16.05.403; and

all other documents issued to the person that are required by law as a condition of taking the fish being pursued.

A resident who takes fish or game on behalf of another person under this section may, subject to applicable regulations of the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game, take the fish or game only under those conditions that would apply to the other person if the other person took the fish or game personally.

A resident who takes, or attempts to take, fish or game on behalf of a person under this section may also simultaneously engage in fishing or hunting for the resident’s use; however, the resident may not take or attempt to take fish or game by proxy for more than one person at a time. For the purposes of this subsection, a resident is engaged in taking, or attempting to take, fish or game by proxy while the resident has possession of

another person’s

license, permit, or identification card issued under AS

16.05.400(b)

and all other documents issued to the person that are required by law as a condition of taking the fish or game being pursued; and

signed document under (b)(1) or (c)(1) of this section; or

fish or game taken on behalf of another person.

A resident who takes fish or game on behalf on another person under this section shall

complete reports relating to the taking of the fish or game as required by the commissioner of fish and game under AS

16.05.370

;

deliver all parts of fish and game removed from the field to the person on whose behalf the fish or game was taken within a reasonable time after the fish or game is taken; and

until the fish or game is delivered to the person on whose behalf the fish or game was taken, retain the person’s

license or permit and all other documents issued to the person that are required by law as a condition of taking the fish or game; and

signed document required under (b)(1) or (c)(1) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 1967; am E.O. No. 73 § 8 (1989); am § 3 ch 81 SLA 1992; am §§ 24 — 26 ch 30 SLA 1996; am §§ 27 — 29 ch 18 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 1, art. 1.

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 2, art. 1.

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 77, art. 1.

For licenses, harvest tickets, harvest reports, tags, and fees, see 5 AAC 92, art. 2.

Legislative history reports. —

For the purpose of the amendments made to subsections (c), (e), and (f) by §§ 24-26,
ch. 30, SLA 1996 (CSSB 310 (STA)), see 1996 Senate Journal Supp. No. 15 (June 27, 1996).

Sec. 16.05.407.
Nonresident hunting big game animals must be accompanied.

It is unlawful for a nonresident to hunt, pursue, or take brown bear, grizzly bear, mountain goat, or sheep in this state, unless personally accompanied by

a person who is licensed as

a registered guide-outfitter or a master guide-outfitter under AS 08.54 and who is providing big game hunting services to the nonresident under a contract with the nonresident; or

a class-A assistant guide or an assistant guide under AS 08.54 and who is employed by a registered guide-outfitter or a master guide-outfitter who has a contract to provide big game hunting services to the nonresident; or

a resident over 19 years of age who is

the spouse of the nonresident; or

related to the nonresident, within and including the second degree of kindred, by marriage or blood.

An applicant for a nonresident big game tag for the taking of an animal specified in (a) of this section shall first furnish to the state, on a form provided by the state, an affidavit showing that the applicant will be personally accompanied while hunting by a person who is qualified under the terms of (a) of this section. A person who falsifies the required affidavit is guilty of perjury under AS

11.56.200

.

[Repealed, § 27 ch 71 SLA 1986.]

A nonresident who violates (a) of this section, or who fails to furnish an affidavit under (b) of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 37 SLA 1989.]

An applicant for a nonresident hunt permit for the taking of an animal specified in (a) of this section shall, if requested by the department, first furnish to the department proof of prior authorization to use federal, state, or private land where the permit hunt will occur. The authorization shall be provided to the applicant by the registered guide-outfitter or master guide-outfitter with whom the applicant has contracted to guide the permit hunt.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1967; am §§ 39, 40 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 111 SLA 1984; am §§ 24, 25, 27 ch 71 SLA 1986; am §§ 9, 10 ch 160 SLA 1988; am §§ 5 — 7, 18 ch 37 SLA 1989; am §§ 6, 7 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 2002; am §§ 35, 36 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

16.05.405

. Renumbered in 1967.

In 1989, “is” was deleted from the beginning of subsection (a)(2)(B) to correct a manifest error in the original enactment.

Administrative Code. —

For seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 85, art. 2.

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The state can require an Alaska resident to have a guide if there is a sufficient factual basis to support the need for residents to be accompanied by a guide. Mar. 14, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

In general, the validity of big game guide requirements is premised upon the need to protect public resources and the hunting public. Hazards of rugged terrain, dangerous animals, and inclement weather have also been raised as justifications for requiring hunters to be accompanied by guides. Similarly, the need to protect public resources from hunters unfamiliar with state conservation laws has also been cited as a basis for requiring a guide. Mar. 14, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.408.
Nonresident alien hunter to be accompanied by guide.

It is a class A misdemeanor for a nonresident alien to hunt, pursue, or take a big game animal as defined by the Board of Game unless personally accompanied by

a registered guide-outfitter or a master guide-outfitter licensed under AS 08.54 who is providing big game hunting services to the nonresident alien under a contract with the nonresident alien; or

a class-A assistant guide or an assistant guide licensed under AS 08.54 who is employed by a registered guide-outfitter or a master guide-outfitter who has a contract to provide big game hunting services to the nonresident alien.

A nonresident alien, when purchasing a big game tag for the taking of an animal specified in (a) of this section, shall first furnish to the state, on a form provided by the state, an affidavit showing that the nonresident alien will be accompanied in the hunt by a person who is qualified under the terms of (a) of this section. A nonresident alien shall have a copy of the affidavit in possession while in the field hunting. A person who falsifies the required affidavit is guilty of perjury under AS

11.56.200

.

Before obtaining a nonresident hunt permit for the taking of an animal specified in (a) of this section, a nonresident alien shall, if requested by the department, first furnish to the department proof of prior authorization to use federal or private land where the permit hunt will occur. The authorization shall be provided to the nonresident alien by the registered guide-outfitter or master guide-outfitter with whom the nonresident alien has contracted to guide the permit hunt.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 13 SLA 1983; am §§ 8, 9 ch 37 SLA 1989; am §§ 8, 9 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 14 SLA 2002; am §§ 37, 38 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For penalties for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

and

12.55.135(a)

.

Administrative Code. —

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

Sec. 16.05.410.
Revocation of license.

Upon conviction of a person of a first violation of AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

or of a federal or state law or regulation for the protection of the sport fish and game of the state, the court may, in addition to the penalty imposed by law, revoke the person’s license.

Upon subsequent conviction of a person for a violation of AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

or of a federal or state law or regulation for the protection of the sport fish and game of the state, the court shall revoke the person’s license.

A person whose license has been revoked as provided in (b) of this section may not purchase another license of the same type for a period of not less than two years nor more than three years from the date of revocation as determined by the court.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 32 SLA 1968.]

[Repealed, § 2 ch 32 SLA 1968.]

Except as provided in (g) of this section, the provisions of (a) — (c) of this section do not apply when the offense for which the person is convicted is a misdemeanor for which a forfeitable bail amount has been set under AS

16.05.165

.

When a person has been convicted during a two-year period of two or more misdemeanor offenses for which a forfeitable bail amount has been set under AS

16.05.165

, a peace officer may file a civil action in the district court to revoke the person’s license. Once an action has been filed, the court shall set a time and date for a hearing on the proposed license revocation, and shall send notice of the hearing to the person. The hearing shall be before the court without a jury. At the hearing the court shall hear evidence regarding the nature and seriousness of the offenses for which the person was convicted, the time period involved, the potential effect of the person’s actions upon the preservation of the resource, and other relevant circumstances. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the person’s actions demonstrate a disregard for the preservation of the state’s fish or wildlife resources, the court may revoke the person’s license for a period of not less than one year nor more than three years from the date of revocation.

For purposes of enforcement of the provisions of the Wildlife Violator Compact entered into under AS

16.05.332

, upon the receipt of a report that a violator has failed to comply with the terms of a citation for a wildlife violation issued by an issuing state other than this state or of the violator’s conviction of a wildlife violation in an issuing state other than this state, a peace officer may file a civil action in the district court to revoke the comparable license or licenses that the violator holds in this state. Once an action has been filed, the court shall set a time and date for a hearing on the proposed license revocation or revocations and shall send notice of the hearing to the violator. The hearing shall be before the court without a jury. At the hearing, the court shall hear evidence regarding the nature and seriousness of the offense for which the violator was convicted or the nature and seriousness of the failure to comply with the citation, the time period involved, the potential effect of the violator’s actions on the preservation of the resource, and other relevant circumstances. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the violator’s actions demonstrate a disregard for the preservation of wildlife resources, the court may revoke the violator’s license or licenses for a period of not less than one year or more than three years from the date of revocation. In this subsection, the terms “issuing state,” “wildlife,” and “wildlife violation” have the meanings given in AS

16.05.332

.

History.

(§ 8 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 17 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 1962; am §§ 4, 5 ch 75 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 32 SLA 1968; am § 15 ch 132 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 2008)

Sec. 16.05.415.
Determination of residency.

In AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

, a person, except as provided in (c) — (f) of this section, is a resident if the person

is physically present in the state with the intent to remain in the state indefinitely and to make a home in the state;

has maintained the person’s domicile in the state for the 12 consecutive months immediately preceding the application for a license;

is not claiming residency in another state, territory, or country; and

is not obtaining benefits under a claim of residency in another state, territory, or country.

A person who establishes residency in the state under (a) of this section remains a resident during an absence from the state unless during the absence the person

establishes or claims residency in another state, territory, or country; or

performs an act, or is absent under circumstances, that are inconsistent with the intent required under (a) of this section.

A person who is a member of the military service or the United States Coast Guard is a resident for the purposes of AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

if the person has been stationed in the state for the 12 consecutive months immediately preceding the application for a license. This subsection does not apply to a person who establishes and maintains residency in the state under (a) and (b) of this section.

A person who is the dependent of a resident member of the military service or the United States Coast Guard under (a) or (c) of this section is a resident for the purposes of AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

if the person has lived in the state for the 12 consecutive months immediately preceding the application for a license. This subsection does not apply to a person who establishes and maintains residency in the state under (a) and (b) of this section.

A person who is an alien is a resident for the purposes of AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

if the person

is physically present in the state with the intent to remain in the state indefinitely and to make a home in the state;

has maintained the person’s domicile in the state for the 12 consecutive months immediately preceding the application for a license;

is not claiming residency in another state, territory, or country; and

is not obtaining benefits under a claim of residency in another state, territory, or country.

In AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

, a person who is not a natural person, other than a sole proprietorship, establishes residency by maintaining its main office or headquarters in the state and providing proof, satisfactory to the commissioner, of that fact to the department or an agent of the department upon demand. A sole proprietorship has the same residency as the person, whether natural or otherwise, who is the proprietor of the entity. The commissioner may adopt regulations as necessary to implement this subsection.

A natural person who does not qualify as a resident under (a) — (e) of this section does not qualify as a resident by virtue of an interest in a resident business entity under (f) of this section.

In AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

, a nonresident

person is a person who does not qualify as a resident under (a) — (f) of this section; and

alien is an alien person who does not qualify as a resident under (e) of this section.

In this section, “license” means a license, tag, permit, stamp, identification card issued under AS

16.05.400(b)

, or other indicia of permission to engage in an activity subject to AS

16.05.330

-

16.05.430

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 38 SLA 1997; am § 30 ch 18 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (i), inserted “issued under AS

16.05.400(b)

” following “identification card”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A member of the military who claims Alaska residency, and who is transferred to another state, may be allowed to obtain a “resident” rather than a “nonresident” hunting or fishing license in that state, based upon the service member’s military status. Alaska statutes allow for such a limited availability of resident licenses for military personnel who are stationed in Alaska but claim residency elsewhere. Determination of each service member’s status must be made on a case–by–case basis, but where the licensing and residency laws of other jurisdictions mirror Alaska’s, a service member may obtain a “resident” license in the other jurisdiction without forfeiting Alaska residency.
2003 Op. Att'y Gen. 14.